Utah statutes.
53B-12-108.   State grants to the authority.

(1)  The state may make grants of money or property to the authority to enable it to carry out its purposes and exercise its powers, including grants to the Utah Higher Education Assistance Authority Guarantee Fund.

(2)  This section does not limit the power the state has to make grants to the authority.

